Missouri, session 2026, SB1331.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 28.190, 29.280, 30.060, 30.070,
105.030, and 105.050, RSMo, are repealed and five new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 28.190, 30.060,
105.025, 105.030, and 105.050, to read as follows:
28.190. In case of death, resignation, removal from
office, impeachment or vacancy from any cause in the office
of secretary of state, [the governor shall immediately
appoint a qualified person to fill such vacancy for the
remainder of the term in which such vacancy occurred and
until his successor is elected or appointed, commissioned
and qualified; and] the governor shall take charge of the
office and superintend its business until [such person is
appointed, commissioned and qualified; except that] a
successor is elected pursuant to section 105.025. In case
of impeachment, the governor shall appoint a qualified
person to serve only until such impeachment is determined,
when the suspended officer, if acquitted, shall be
reinstated in office, or if the suspended officer is
convicted, a [new appointment] writ of election shall be
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1331 2
[made] issued by the governor [as in the case of other
vacancies] pursuant to section 105.025.
30.060. In case of death, resignation, removal from
office, impeachment or vacancy from any cause, in the office
of the state treasurer, the governor shall take charge of
such office and superintend the business thereof until a
successor is [appointed, commissioned and qualified except]
elected pursuant to section 105.025. In case of
impeachment, [when] no [appointment shall be made] writ of
election shall be issued until a determination of the matter
is had[, when,]. In the event of an acquittal, the
suspended officer shall be reinstated in office. In the
event of conviction, the governor shall issue a writ of
election pursuant to section 105.025.
105.025. Whenever any vacancy, caused in any manner or
by any means whatsoever, occurs or exists in the office of
lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state auditor,
state treasurer, or attorney general, the vacancy shall be
filled by special election. The governor shall, not later
than thirty days after receiving notice of the vacancy,
issue a writ of election to the secretary of state or, as
the case may be, the acting secretary of state in the event
of a vacancy in the office of secretary of state. The
special election shall be held not later than sixty days
after the issuance of the writ of election.
105.030. 1. Whenever any vacancy, caused in any
manner or by any means whatsoever, occurs or exists in any
state or county office originally filled by election of the
people, other than in the offices of [lieutenant governor,]
state senator or representative, sheriff, or recorder of
deeds in the City of St. Louis, the vacancy shall be filled
by appointment by the governor except that when a vacancy

SB 1331 3
occurs in the office of county assessor after a general
election at which a person other than the incumbent has been
elected, the person so elected shall be appointed to fill
the remainder of the unexpired term; and the person
appointed after duly qualifying and entering upon the
discharge of his duties under the appointment shall continue
in office until the first Monday in January next following
the first ensuing general election, at which general
election a person shall be elected to fill the unexpired
portion of the term, or for the ensuing regular term, as the
case may be, and the person so elected shall enter upon the
discharge of the duties of the office the first Monday in
January next following his election, except that when the
term to be filled begins on any day other than the first
Monday in January, the appointee of the governor shall be
entitled to hold the office until such other date.
2. (1) Notwithstanding subsection 1 of this section
or any other provision of law to the contrary, when any
vacancy, caused in any manner or by any means whatsoever,
occurs or exists in any county office, the county commission
of all noncharter counties shall, no later than fourteen
days after the occurrence of the vacancy, fill the vacancy
by appointment, and the person so appointed by the county
commission, after duly qualifying and entering upon the
discharge of his or her duties under the appointment, shall
continue in office until the governor fills the vacancy by
appointment under subsection 1 of this section or until the
vacancy is filled by operation of another provision of law.
(2) In any county with only two county commissioners,
if the commissioners cannot agree upon an appointee, the two
remaining county commissioners and the presiding judge of

SB 1331 4
the circuit court shall vote to make the appointment
required under subdivision (1) of this subsection.
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to:
(1) Vacancies in county offices in any county which
has adopted a charter for its own government under [Section
18] Sections 18(a) to 18(r), Article VI of the Constitution;
[or]
(2) Vacancies in the office of any associate circuit
judge, circuit judge, circuit clerk, prosecuting attorney,
or circuit attorney; or
(3) Vacancies in the offices of lieutenant governor,
secretary of state, state auditor, state treasurer, or
attorney general.
4. Any vacancy in the office of recorder of deeds in
the City of St. Louis shall be filled by appointment by the
mayor of that city.
105.050. If any vacancy shall happen from any cause in
the office of the [attorney general,] circuit attorney,
prosecuting attorney or assistant prosecuting attorney, the
governor, upon being satisfied that such vacancy exists,
shall appoint some competent person to fill the same until
the next regular election for [attorney general,]
prosecuting attorney or assistant prosecuting attorney, as
the case may be; provided, in the case of a vacancy in the
office of prosecuting attorney, if there is no qualified
person in the county who can or will accept such
appointment, then the governor may appoint any person who
possesses all the qualifications set forth in section
56.010, except the qualification as to residence.
[29.280. When a vacancy occurs in the
office of state auditor the governor shall
immediately appoint an auditor to fill such

SB 1331 5
vacancy for the residue of the term in which the
vacancy occurred, and until his successor is
elected or appointed, commissioned and
qualified.]
[30.070. When a vacancy occurs in the
office of state treasurer, the governor shall
immediately appoint a state treasurer to fill
such vacancy for the residue of the term in
which the vacancy occurred, and until his
successor is elected or appointed, commissioned
and qualified.]
✓